dev/noun/noun.ne.dix
  <!-- पुरुष; पुरुष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पुरुष__n_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रूप; रूप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रूप__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उल्लेख; उल्लेख; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उल्लेख__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुख; मुख; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुख__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विश्व; विश्व; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विश्व__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कार्यक्रम; कार्यक्रम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कार्यक्रम__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देवी; देवी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देवी__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- योजना; योजना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="योजना__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पत्रकार; पत्रकार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पत्रकार__n_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रकार; प्रकार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रकार__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वातावरण; वातावरण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वातावरण__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मन्त्री; मन्त्री; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मन्त्री__n_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- व्यक्ति; व्यक्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="व्यक्ति__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नारी; नारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नारी__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कारण; कारण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कारण__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देउवा; देउवा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देउवा__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथ; साथ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथ__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धर्म; धर्म; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धर्म__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छोरा; छोरा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छोरा__n_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मन; मन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मन__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निर्णय; निर्णय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निर्णय__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रधानमन्त्री; प्रधानमन्त्री; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रधानमन्त्री__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- श्रीमती; श्रीमती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="श्रीमती__n_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुलुक; मुलुक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुलुक__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गाउँ; गाउँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गाउँ__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sp"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किसिम; किसिम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किसिम__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अर्थ; अर्थ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अर्थ__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रतिनिधि; प्रतिनिधि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रतिनिधि__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धारणा; धारणा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धारणा__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- इतिहास; इतिहास; 1 -->
    <pardef n="इतिहास__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कथा; कथा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कथा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ज्ञान; ज्ञान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ज्ञान__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रयोग; प्रयोग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रयोग__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मानव; मानव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मानव__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पार्टी; पार्टी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पार्टी__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कार्य; कार्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कार्य__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निर्माण; निर्माण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निर्माण__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="पुरुष"><i>पुरुष</i><par n="पुरुष__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रूप"><i>रूप</i><par n="रूप__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="उल्लेख"><i>उल्लेख</i><par n="उल्लेख__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="मुख"><i>मुख</i><par n="मुख__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="विश्व"><i>विश्व</i><par n="विश्व__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कार्यक्रम"><i>कार्यक्रम</i><par n="कार्यक्रम__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="देवी"><i>देवी</i><par n="देवी__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="योजना"><i>योजना</i><par n="योजना__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पत्रकार"><i>पत्रकार</i><par n="पत्रकार__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रकार"><i>प्रकार</i><par n="प्रकार__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="वातावरण"><i>वातावरण</i><par n="वातावरण__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="मन्त्री"><i>मन्त्री</i><par n="मन्त्री__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="व्यक्ति"><i>व्यक्ति</i><par n="व्यक्ति__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="नारी"><i>नारी</i><par n="नारी__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="कारण"><i>कारण</i><par n="कारण__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="देउवा"><i>देउवा</i><par n="देउवा__np"/></e>
    <e lm="साथ"><i>साथ</i><par n="साथ__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="धर्म"><i>धर्म</i><par n="धर्म__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="छोरा"><i>छोरा</i><par n="छोरा__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मन"><i>मन</i><par n="मन__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="निर्णय"><i>निर्णय</i><par n="निर्णय__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रधानमन्त्री"><i>प्रधानमन्त्री</i><par n="प्रधानमन्त्री__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="श्रीमती"><i>श्रीमती</i><par n="श्रीमती__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मुलुक"><i>मुलुक</i><par n="मुलुक__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गाउँ"><i>गाउँ</i><par n="गाउँ__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="किसिम"><i>किसिम</i><par n="किसिम__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्थ"><i>अर्थ</i><par n="अर्थ__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिनिधि"><i>प्रतिनिधि</i><par n="प्रतिनिधि__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="धारणा"><i>धारणा</i><par n="धारणा__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="इतिहास"><i>इतिहास</i><par n="इतिहास__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="कथा"><i>कथा</i><par n="कथा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ज्ञान"><i>ज्ञान</i><par n="ज्ञान__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रयोग"><i>प्रयोग</i><par n="प्रयोग__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="मानव"><i>मानव</i><par n="मानव__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पार्टी"><i>पार्टी</i><par n="पार्टी__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कार्य"><i>कार्य</i><par n="कार्य__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="निर्माण"><i>निर्माण</i><par n="निर्माण__n_nt_nn"/></e>
